Maine, session 132, LD23.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 13 MRSA §732, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. C, §26 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is further amended to read:
5. Legal guardian or personal representative of deceased or incapacitated dentist.
For the purposes of this chapter, the legal guardian or personal representative of a dentist
licensed under Title 32, chapter 143 may contract with another dentist to continue the
operations of the practice of the deceased or incapacitated dentist for a period of up to 24
48 months after the death or incapacitation of the dentist or until the practice is sold,
whichever occurs first. For purposes of this subsection, "personal representative" has the
same meaning as in Title 18‑C, section 1‑201, subsection 40.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR0086(03)